Connecticut, session 2026, HB05242.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cannabis" means marijuana, as defined in section 21a-240 of the
general statutes;
(2) "Health care facility" means a (A) hospital or nursing home, as
such terms are defined in section 19a-490 of the general statutes, or (B)
hospice inpatient facility or short-term hospital special hospice, licensed
pursuant to chapter 368v of the general statutes;
(3) "Qualifying patient" means a "qualifying patient", as defined in
section 21a-408 of the general statutes, who (A) has obtained a valid
certificate of registration pursuant to subsection (a) of section 21a-408d
of the general statutes, and (B) is terminally ill; and
(4) "Terminally ill" means a medical condition resulting in a
LCO No. 1586 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5242
prognosis of life of one year or less, if the disease follows its natural
course, as certified in writing, by a qualifying patient's attending
physician, as defined in section 19a-570 of the general statutes.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, health care
facility shall allow a qualifying patient to use cannabis within the health
care facility and shall:
(1) Prohibit smoking or vaping as methods to use cannabis;
(2) Include the use of cannabis within a qualifying patient's medical
records;
(3) Require a qualifying patient to provide a copy of a qualifying
patient's certificate of registration, issued pursuant to subsection (a) of
section 21a-408d of the general statutes;
(4) Reasonably restrict the manner in which a qualifying patient
stores and uses cannabis, including, but not limited to, requiring the
cannabis to be stored in a locked container, to ensure the safety of other
patients, guests and employees of the health care facility, in compliance
with other provisions of the general statutes and the safe operations of
the health care facility; and
(5) Develop and disseminate written guidelines for the use of
cannabis by qualifying patients within the health care facility.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a qualifying
patient receiving emergency care shall not be permitted to use cannabis
while the qualifying patient is receiving emergency care.
(d) (1) If a federal regulatory agency, the United States Department
of Justice or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
takes one of the following actions, a health care facility may suspend
compliance with the provisions of this section until the regulatory
agency, the United States Department of Justice or the federal Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies the health care facility that
LCO No. 1586 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5242
it may resume permitting qualifying patients' use of cannabis within the
facility:
(A) A federal regulatory agency or the United States Department of
Justice initiates enforcement action against a health care facility related
to the facility's compliance with the provisions of this section.
(B) A federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of
Justice or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services issues
a rule or otherwise provides notification to the health care facility that
expressly prohibits the use of cannabis in health care facilities or
otherwise prohibits compliance with the provisions of this section.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to permit
a health care facility to prohibit qualifying patient use of cannabis due
solely to the fact that cannabis is a schedule I controlled substance
pursuant to the federal Controlled Substances Act, or other federal
constraints on the use of cannabis that were in existence prior to October
1, 2026.
Sec. 2. Section 21a-422m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this section, "hospital" has the same meaning as provided
in section 19a-490 and "cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420. [No] Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
hospital shall be required to allow a patient to use cannabis while at such
hospital. A hospital may have a policy that sets forth restrictions
patients shall follow regarding cannabis use.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 21a-422m
LCO No. 1586 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5242